West Virginia, session 2026, SB664.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. UNIFORM REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER ON DEATH ACT. §36-12-5. Transfer on death deed authorized. (a) An individual may transfer property to one or more beneficiaries or contingent beneficiaries effective at the transferor's death by a transfer on death deed.(b) A power of attorney or conservator may sign a transfer on death deed.